Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2731.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Repeal Section 41-3026.12, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed. Sec. 2. Title 41, chapter 27, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-3030.19, to read: START_STATUTE41.3030.19. Arizona regulatory board of physician assistants; termination July 1, 2030 A. The Arizona regulatory board of physician assistants terminates on July 1, 3030. B. Title 32, chapter 25 and this section are repealed on January 1, 3031. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Purpose Pursuant to section 41-2955, subsection B, Arizona Revised Statutes, the legislature continues the Arizona regulatory board of physician assistants to promote the safe and professional practice of health care tasks performed by physician assistants. Sec. 4. Retroactivity Sections 1 and 2 of this act apply retroactively to from and after July 1, 2026.